District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.98

Temporary license.

In the event of emergency circumstances, the Board may, pursuant to rule, issue a temporary license for a period not to exceed 30 days.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2151(f), 57 DCR 181
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2151(f) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2151(f) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).